Maryland, session 2026, HB0688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–402.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0688*

HOUSE BILL 688
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subtitle it is unlawful for any
person to:
(1) Willfully intercept, endeavor to intercept, or procure any other person
to intercept or endeavor to intercept, any wire, oral, or electronic communication;
(2) Willfully disclose, or endeavor to disclose, to any other person the
contents of any wire, oral, or electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know
that the information was obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic
communication in violation of this subtitle; or
(3) Willfully use, or endeavor to use, the contents of any wire, oral, or
electronic communication, knowing or having reason to know that the information was
obtained through the interception of a wire, oral, or electronic communication in violation
of this subtitle.
(b) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a [felony]
MISDEMEANOR and is subject to imprisonment for not more than 5 years or a fine of not
more than $10,000, or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.